Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-122
Member of the Legislature; start of
second half of term of office.

The second half of a term of office for a member of the
Legislature starts on the day of the meeting of the Legislature at which members
are regularly sworn in to office in the second calendar year which begins
after the four-year term begins.

Laws 2014, LB946, § 11.